Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-1007
Equal Opportunity Commission; enforcement; powers.

The Age Discrimination in Employment Act shall be administered by the Equal Opportunity Commission as established by section 48-1116. The commission shall have the power (1) to make delegations, to appoint such agents and employees and to pay for technical assistance, including legal assistance, on a fee-for-service basis, as it deems necessary to assist it in the performance of its functions under the act, (2) to cooperate with other federal, state, and local agencies and to cooperate with and furnish technical assistance to employers, labor organizations, and employment agencies to aid in effectuating the purposes of the act, (3) to make investigations, to issue or cause to be served interrogatories, and to require keeping of records necessary or appropriate for the administration of the act, and (4) to bring civil action in its name in any court of competent jurisdiction against any person deemed to be violating the act to compel compliance with the act or to enjoin any such person from continuing any practice that is deemed to be in violation of the act. The commission may seek judicial enforcement through the office of the Attorney General to require the answering of interrogatories and to gain access to evidence or records relevant to the charge under investigation.

Laws 1972, LB 1357, § 5;

Laws 1977, LB 162, § 22;

Laws 2007, LB265, § 18.